Utah statutes.
73-5a-302.   Failure to conform to plans.
(1)  If at any time during construction, enlargement, repair, alteration, or
removal of any dam the state engineer finds that the work is not being done in
accordance with the approved plans and specifications, he shall:
(a)  notify the owner of the failure to comply;
(b)  order the owner to effect compliance with the plans and specifications;
or
(c)  approve the modification to the approved plans and specifications.
(2)  The state engineer may order that no further work be done until
compliance has been effected and approved by him.
(3)  A failure to comply with the approved plans and specifications shall
render the approval subject to revocation by the state engineer. If compliance
is not effected in a reasonable time, the state engineer may order the
incomplete structure removed in order to eliminate any safety hazard to life
or property.
